Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB148.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6109(c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended, subsection (e)(1) is amended by adding a subparagraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6109. Licenses.* * *(c) Form of application and content.--The application for a license to carry a firearm shall be uniform throughout this Commonwealth and shall be on a form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police. The form may contain provisions, not exceeding one page, to assure compliance with this section. Issuing authorities shall use only the application form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police. One of the 123456789101112131415161718 following reasons for obtaining a firearm license shall be set forth in the application: self-defense, employment, hunting and fishing, target shooting, gun collecting or another proper reason. The application form shall be dated and signed by the applicant and shall contain the following statement:I have never been convicted of a crime that prohibits me from possessing or acquiring a firearm under Federal or State law. I am of sound mind and have never been committed to a mental institution. I have successfully completed a firearms safety course as required by law. I hereby certify that the statements contained herein are true and correct to the best of my knowledge and belief. I understand that, if I knowingly make any false statements herein, I am subject to penalties prescribed by law. I authorize the sheriff, or his designee, or, in the case of first class cities, the chief or head of the police department, or his designee, to inspect only those records or documents relevant to information required for this application. If I am issued a license and knowingly become ineligible to legally possess or acquire firearms, I will promptly notify the sheriff of the county in which I reside or, if I reside in a city of the first class, the chief of police of that city.* * *(e) Issuance of license.--(1) A license to carry a firearm shall be for the purpose of carrying a firearm concealed on or about one's person or in a vehicle and shall be issued if, after an investigation not to exceed 45 days, it appears that the applicant is an individual concerning whom no good cause 20250SB0148PN0095 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exists to deny the license. A license shall not be issued to any of the following:* * *(xv) An individual who has not demonstrated competence with a firearm in accordance with subsection (e.1).* * *(e.1) Firearms competency.-- (1) An individual may demonstrate competence with a firearm by any one of the following: (i) Completion of a hunter education or hunter safety course approved by the Pennsylvania Game Commission or a similar agency of another state.(ii) Completion of a National Rifle Association firearms safety or training course.(iii) Completion of a firearms safety or training course or class available to the general public offered by a law enforcement agency, educational institution, private or public institution or organization or firearms training school, utilizing instructors certified by the National Rifle Association or the Pennsylvania State Police.(iv) Completion of a law enforcement firearms safety or training course or class offered for law enforcement or security enforcement personnel.(v) Presentation of evidence of equivalent experience with a firearm through participation in organized shooting competition or military service.(vi) Completion of a firearms training or safety course or class conducted by a State-certified or 20250SB0148PN0095 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 National Rifle Association certified firearms instructor.(2) The following shall constitute evidence of qualification under this subsection:(i) a photocopy of a certificate of completion of any of the courses or classes under paragraph (1);(ii) an affidavit from the instructor, school, club, organization or group that conducted or taught the course or class attesting to the completion of the course or class by the applicant; or(iii) a copy of a document which shows completion of the course or class or evidences participation in firearms competition.(3) A person who conducts a course or class under paragraph (1)(ii), (iii) or (vi) or who, as an instructor, attests to the completion of the course or class, shall maintain records certifying that the person or instructor observed the student safely handle and discharge the firearm. A record shall be retained for two years following completion of the course or class.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0148PN0095 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021